District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-301.91

Penalties for failure to file 2-year report..

Repealed.

History

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 300, Pub. L. 87-569, § 91
Sept. 8, 1995, D.C. Law 11-42, § 2(g), 42 DCR 3285
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-181, § 2(e), 43 DCR 4503
June 5, 2003, D.C. Law 14-307, § 1604(b), 49 DCR 11664
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-301.91.
1981 Ed., § 29-592.
1973 Ed., § 29-1091.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(b) of the Business and Nonprofit Corporation Five-Year Annual Report Suspension Temporary Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-150, July 20, 1996, law notification 44 DCR 2863).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary suspension in section of references to 5-year reporting, filing, or payment of fees requirements until after December 31, 1996, at which time the 1-year or annual requirements shall be in effect and the annual report fee shall be $25, see § 3(b) of the Business and Nonprofit Corporation Five-Year Report Suspension Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-247, April 11, 1996, 43 DCR 2125).
For temporary suspension of the 5-year reporting provision, see § 3(b) of the Business and Nonprofit Corporation Five-Year Annual Report Suspension Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-307, August 1, 1996, 43 DCR 4208).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1604(b) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-544, December 4, 2002, 49 DCR 11700).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1604(b) of the Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-27, February 24, 2003, 50 DCR 2151).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1604(b) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-103, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5499).

Editor's Notes

Preparation and payment of appropriate taxes: Section 2(g) of D.C. Law 11-181 provided that nothing in that act shall be construed or interpreted as repealing or affecting any requirement of a domestic or foreign corporation to prepare and submit annual tax forms, or to pay any appropriate District or federal tax, as provided in accordance with the laws of the District of Columbia or the United States.